Delaware, session 153, SB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 33, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 334. State dragonfly. The Blue Dasher (Pachydiplax longipennis) is the official dragonfly of the State.